Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 3. Animals Running at Large

§ 11-31-301.
Public
nuisance; notice; penalties; rules and regulations; animal control
districts and officers.

A board of county commissioners may declare the running at large of any specified animals in unincorporated areas within the county limits a public nuisance.

Notice of such a declaration shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the county and notices may be placed in appropriate locations. The notice shall specify any regulations necessary and convenient for animal control and shall state that:

It is a public nuisance for one (1) or more specified animals to be running at large in unincorporated areas;

A fine shall be imposed on the owner of such animal and restitution for any damages to person or property caused by the animal shall be made by the owner;

Dogs or other animals, whose ownership cannot be determined, may be destroyed.

Upon the filing of any complaint, the county sheriff may arrest or issue a summons to the owner of any animal which is running at large or has attacked a person. A first conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00). Each subsequent conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

A dog injuring or killing livestock may be killed by the owner of the livestock or his agent or any peace officer.

Any animal attacking any person in a vicious manner or that bites any person may be impounded by the county sheriff or animal control officer and held in quarantine for at least ten (10) days or as long as necessary as determined by the Wyoming state health officer after the attack to determine whether the animal has any disease which may be communicated to humans. Home quarantine may be allowed as determined by the animal control officer or the county sheriff if the animal’s owner or custodian presents a valid rabies vaccination certificate showing the animal has been vaccinated against rabies by a licensed veterinarian. The costs of impoundment, quarantine and testing shall be paid by the owner or custodian of the animal. Any animal which attacks any person in a vicious manner may be destroyed or the owner or custodian of the animal may be fined not more than two hundred dollars ($200.00), or both. Proof of the fact that the animal has bitten or attacked any person at any place where a person is legally entitled to be is evidence that the animal is vicious within the meaning of this section. A copy of any animal control officer report regarding the animal bite shall be submitted to the state health officer.

Upon the declaration of a public nuisance, the county sheriff may dispose of any unlicensed animals, the ownership of which cannot be determined.

A board of county commissioners may enact regulations relative to dogs running at large, vicious dogs, dogs running wild game or livestock or acts by other animals which shall carry out the purposes of this section. The county sheriff shall and a county animal control officer or any other peace officer may enforce these regulations to protect persons and property.

A board of county commissioners may require an annual county license or tag for animals within their jurisdiction upon payment of a fee of not more than ten dollars ($10.00). Funds collected pursuant to this subsection may be used for animal control or for the maintenance of animal control centers for either purpose.

A board of county commissioners may establish and provide for the operation of animal control districts which may encompass all or parts of the unincorporated area of the county and may cooperate with municipalities in a joint animal control program. Joint animal control programs may employ joint animal control officers who have the authority to enforce the animal control regulations and ordinances of each of the participating entities.

As used in W.S.

11-31-301

“animal” means a dog or cat.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section regarding impounding an animal to determine disease status, nothing in this section shall apply to any livestock guarding animal which is actively engaged in protecting livestock. Except in the case of gross or willful negligence, no liability shall accrue to the owner, or his agent, of any livestock guarding animal for any injury to any person or animal received from any livestock guarding animal which was actively engaged in protecting livestock.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 73, § 1; 1983, ch. 123, § 1; 1984, ch. 37, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 41, § 1; 2009, ch. 173, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (e), substituted “animal” for “dog” throughout the subsection, in the first sentence, inserted “or that bites any person” preceding “may be impounded” and substituted “ten (10) days or as long as necessary as determined by the Wyoming state health officer” for “fifteen (15) days and not more than twenty (20) days”, in the second sentence, substituted “Home quarantine may be allowed as determined by the animal control officer or the county sheriff” for “except that no dog shall be quarantined”, and added the last sentence; in (h), substituted “animal” for “dog” throughout the subsection and substituted “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00)”; and added (m).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (m), deleted the former last sentence, which read: “As used in this subsection, ‘animal’ means as defined in W.S. 11-29-101(a)(i).”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Dog as personal property for purposes of willful destruction
of property statute. —

A dog of a person living in an unincorporated area of a county, who is not required to license his dog, is personal property for purposes of the willful destruction of property statute. Irwin v. State, 658 P.2d 64,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1983).

Elements for strict liability. —

The court declined to abrogate the scienter element of common law strict liability in a dog bite case. Borns v. Voss, 2003 WY 74, 70 P.3d 262,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2003).

Cited

in

Larsen v. City of Cheyenne, 626 P.2d 558,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 318

(Wyo. 1981); Roberts v. Klinkosh, 986 P.2d 153,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1999).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Personal injuries inflicted by animal as within homeowner's or personal liability policy, 96 ALR3d 891.

Liability of person, other than owner of animal or owner or operator of motor vehicle, for damage to motor vehicle or injury to person riding therein resulting from collision with domestic animal at large in street or highway, 21 ALR4th 132.

Liability of owner or operator of vehicle for damages to motor vehicle or injury to person riding therein resulting from collision with domestic animal at large in street or highway, 21 ALR4th 159.

Liability of dog owner for injuries sustained by person frightened by dog, 30 ALR4th 986.

Construction of provisions of statute or ordinance governing occasion, time or manner of summary destruction of domestic animals by public authorities, 42 ALR4th 839.

Liability for damage to motor vehicle or injury to person riding therein from collision with runaway horse, or horse left unattended or untied in street, 49 ALR4th 653.

Modern status of rule of absolute or strict liability for dogbite, 51 ALR4th 446.

Liability of governmental entity for damage to motor vehicle or injury to person riding therein resulting from collision between vehicle and domestic animal at large in street or highway, 52 ALR4th 1200.

Liability for killing or injuring, by motor vehicle, livestock or fowl on highway, 55 ALR4th 822.

Who “harbors” or “keeps” dog under animal liability statute, 64 ALR4th 963.

Liability of owner or operator of business premises for injury to patron by dog or cat, 67 ALR4th 976.

Liability for injuries inflicted by dog on public officer or employee, 74 ALR4th 1120.

Validity and construction of statute, ordinance or regulation applying to specific dog breeds, such as “pit bulls” or “bull terriers,” 80 ALR4th 70.

Landlord's liability to third person for injury resulting from attack on leased premises by dangerous or vicious animal kept by tenant, 87 ALR4th 1004.

Landlord's liability to third person for injury resulting from attack off leased premises by dangerous or vicious animal kept by tenant, 89 ALR4th 374.

Intentional provocation, contributory or comparative negligence, or assumption of risk as defense to action for injury by dog, 11 ALR5th 127.

Keeping of domestic animal as constituting public or private nuisance, 90 ALR5th 619.